California statutes. Probate Code
This Certificate of Authority has been issued by the Public Guardian pursuant to and in compliance with the Financial Abuse of Mentally Impaired Elders statute, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2950) of Part 5 of Division 4 of the California Probate Code. Under California law, this Certificate of Authority authorizes the Public Guardian to take possession or control of property belonging to the above-named individual.
SPECIAL NOTE TO FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS:State law requires that upon receiving a copy of this Certificate of Authority, financial institutions shall provide the public guardian with information concerning property held by the above-named individual and surrender the property to the Public Guardian if requested.
This Certificate of Authority shall only be valid when signed and dated by the Public Guardian or a deputy Public Guardian of the County of _____ and affixed with the official seal of the Public Guardian below.
Signature of Public Guardian:Date:Official Seal”

(2) The mere issuance of the declaration provided by this section shall not require the public
 guardian to take possession or control of property and shall not require the public guardian to make a determination that the requirements for the appointment of a conservator are satisfied.

(3) The authority provided to the public guardian in paragraph (1) includes the authority to deny use of, access to, or prohibit residency in the home of the elder, by anyone who does not have a written rental agreement or other legal right to the use of, or access to, the residence, and, subject to the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 2900, the authority to terminate the occupancy of anyone living in the home of the elder person, and the authority to remove that occupant residing therein.

(4) The public guardian shall serve, or cause to be served, a copy of the certification issued pursuant to this section on the elder person by mail within 24 hours of the execution of the
 certification, or as soon thereafter as is practical, in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(5) Receipt of a certification issued under this section constitutes sufficient acquittance to financial institutions and others in possession of an elder person’s property to provide information and surrender property of the elder person to the public guardian. Any financial institution or other person who provides information or surrenders property pursuant to this section shall be discharged from any liability for any act or omission of the public guardian with respect to the property.

(6) A public guardian acting in good faith is not liable when taking possession or control of property pursuant to this section.

(7) A certification issued
 pursuant to this section is valid for 15 days after the date of issuance. Upon ex parte petition to the superior court, the public guardian may seek additional 15-day certifications. The court shall grant that petition only if it determines that the additional certification is necessary to protect the elder from financial abuse and the elder’s property from loss, injury, waste, or misappropriation.

(d) (1) If the public guardian takes possession of an elder person’s property pursuant to this section, the public guardian shall attempt to find agents pursuant to the use of durable powers of attorney or successor trustees nominated in trust instruments, or other persons having legal authority under existing legal instruments, to manage the elder person’s estate.

(2) If the public guardian is unable to find any appropriate person to manage the elder person’s
 estate pursuant to paragraph (1), the public guardian shall attempt to find appropriate family members willing to manage the elder person’s estate. If no documents exist appointing appropriate fiduciaries, the public guardian shall follow the priorities set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1810) of Chapter 1 of Part 3.

(3) The public guardian shall take the steps described in paragraphs (1) and (2) within 15 days of taking possession of an elder person’s property pursuant to this section.

(e) Nothing in this section prevents the county’s adult protective services agency from conducting an investigation regarding the elder person named in the declaration and providing appropriate services, in coordination with any actions taken with the public guardian under this section or an investigation conducted by law enforcement regarding the elder person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 232, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2953.

(a) (1) A public guardian who has taken possession or control of the property of an elder person pursuant to this chapter is entitled to petition a court of competent jurisdiction for the reasonable costs incurred by the public guardian for the protection of the person or the property, together with reasonable fees for services, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys’ fees. These fees shall be payable from the estate of the elder person if the person is not deemed competent by the court and if any of the
 following apply:

(A) The public guardian or someone else is appointed as the temporary or general conservator of the estate.

(B) An attorney-in-fact, under a durable power of attorney, or a trustee, takes steps, or is notified of the need to take steps, to protect the estate of the elder person.

(C) An action is brought against the alleged financial abuser by the elder person, his or her conservator, a trustee, a fiduciary, or a successor in interest of the elder person, arising from a harm that the public guardian taking charge was intended to prevent or minimize.

(2) Any costs incurred by the public guardian pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be compensable as provided in Section 2902. Fees collected by the public guardian pursuant to this chapter shall
 be used for the activities described in this chapter.

(b) When a public guardian has taken possession or control of the property of an elder person pursuant to this chapter, the public guardian shall exercise reasonable care to ensure that the reasonable living expenses and legitimate debts of the elder person are addressed as well as is practical under the circumstances.

(c) Any person identified as a victim in a declaration described in Section 2954 may bring an ex parte petition in the superior court for an order quashing the certification issued by the public guardian as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 2952.

(1) Upon request by the petitioner, the court may defer filing fees related to the petition, and order the public guardian to authorize the release of funds from a financial institution to reimburse
 the petitioner the filing fees from assets belonging to the petitioner, but shall waive filing fees if the petitioner meets the standards of eligibility established by subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 68511.3 of the Government Code for the waiver of a filing fee.

(2) The court shall quash the certification if the court determines that there is insufficient evidence to justify the imposition on the alleged victim’s civil liberties caused by the certification.

(3) If the court determines that there is sufficient evidence to justify the imposition on the alleged victim’s civil liberties caused by the certification, the court may, in its discretion, do one or more of the following:

(A) Order disbursements from the alleged victim’s assets, as are reasonably needed to address the
 alleged victim’s needs.

(B) Appoint a temporary conservator of the alleged victim’s estate, where the facts before the court would be sufficient for the appointment of a temporary conservator under Section 2250.

(C) Deny the petition.

(D) Award reasonable attorney’s fees to the respondent’s attorney from the victim’s estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 232, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.

A declaration issued by a peace officer under this chapter shall not be valid unless it substantially complies with the following form: DECLARATIONPRINT OR TYPE1.My name is:.My badge number is:.My office address and telephone number are:.2.I am a duly sworn peace officer presently employed by , in the County of, in the State of California.3.On _____ (date) I personally interviewed ________ (victim) at 
______ a.m./p.m. at _______ (address). The victim resides 
at __________ (address, telephone number, and name of facility, 
if applicable).4.There is probable cause to believe that:(a) (Victim)is substantially unable to manage his or her financial resourcesor to resist fraud or undue influence, and(b)There exists a significant danger the victim will lose all ora portion of his or her property as a result of fraud ormisrepresentations or the mental incapacity of the victim, and(c)There is probable cause to believe that a crime is beingcommitted against the victim, and(d)The crime is connected to the victim’s inability to managehis or her financial resources or to resist fraud or undueinfluence, and(e)The victim suffers from that inability as a result of deficitsin one or more of the following mental functions:INSTRUCTIONS TO PEACE OFFICER: CHECK ALL
BLOCKS THAT APPLY:[A]ALERTNESS AND ATTENTION◻1.Levels of arousal. (Lethargic, responds only to vigorous 
and persistent stimulation, stupor.)◻2.Orientation. Person ______ Time _______ (day, date, 
month, season, year),Place _______ (address, town, 
state),Situation ___________ (why am I here?).◻3.Ability to attend and concentrate. (Give detailed 
answers from memory, mental ability required to 
thread a
 needle.)[B]INFORMATION PROCESSING 
 Ability to:◻1.Remember, i.e., short– and long–term memory, 
immediate recall. (Deficits reflected by: forgets 
question before answering,
 cannot recall names, 
relatives, past presidents, events of past 24 hours.)◻2.Understand and communicate either verbally or 
otherwise. (Deficits reflected by: inability to 
comprehend questions, follow instructions, use words 
correctly or name objects; nonsense words.)◻3.Recognize familiar objects and persons. (Deficits 
reflected by: inability to recognize familiar faces, 
objects, etc.)◻4.Understand and appreciate quantities. (Perform simple 
calculations.)◻5.Reason using abstract concepts. (Grasp abstract aspects 
of his or her situation; interpret idiomatic expressions or 
proverbs.)◻6.Plan, organize, and carry out actions (assuming physical 
ability) in one’s own rational self–interest. (Break 
complex tasks down into simple steps and carry them
 
out.)◻7.Reason logically.
[C]THOUGHT DISORDERS◻1.Severely disorganized thinking. (Rambling, 
nonsensical, incoherent, or nonlinear thinking.)◻2.Hallucinations. (Auditory, visual, olfactory.)◻3.Delusions. (Demonstrably false belief maintained 
without or against reason or evidence.)◻4.Uncontrollable or intrusive thoughts. (Unwanted 
compulsive thoughts, compulsive
 behavior.)
[D]ABILITY TO MODULATE MOOD AND AFFECTPervasive and persistent or recurrent emotional state 
which appears severely inappropriate in degree to the 
patient’s circumstances. Encircle the
 inappropriate 
mood(s):
AngerEuphoriaHelplessnessAnxietyDepressionApathyFear HopelessnessIndifferencePanic Despair 5.The property at risk is identified as, but not limited to, the 
following:Bank account located at:(name, telephone number, and 
address of the bank branch)Account number(s):Securities/other funds located at:(name, telephone number,and address offinancial institution)Account number(s):Real property located at:(address)Automobile described as:(make, model/color)(license plate number and state)Other property described as:Other property located at:6.A criminal investigation will ◻ will not ◻ be commenced against:(name, address, and telephone number) for alleged financial abuse.BLOCKS 1, 2, AND 3 MUST BE CHECKED IN ORDER FOR 
THIS DECLARATION TO BE VALID:
◻1.I am a peace officer in the county identified above.◻2.I have consulted concerning this case with a supervisor
in the county’s adult protective services agency who has 
signed below, indicating that he or she concurs that, 
based on the information I provided to him or her, or 
based on information he or she obtained independently, 
this declaration is warranted under the circumstances.◻3.I have consulted concerning this case with an individual 
qualified to perform a mental status
 examination.Signature of Declarant Peace OfficerDateSignature of Concurring Adult Protective Services
Supervisor

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2955.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit or restrict a public guardian from undertaking any other proceeding authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. MANAGEMENT OR DISPOSITION OF COMMUNITY PROPERTY WHERE SPOUSE LACKS LEGAL CAPACITY [3000. - 3154.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [3000. - 3023.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [3000. - 3012.]

3000.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

“Community property” means community real property and community personal property, including, but not limited to, a community property business that is or was under the primary management and control of one of the spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3004.

“Conservator” means conservator of the estate, or limited conservator of the estate to the extent that the powers and duties of the limited conservator are specifically and expressly provided by the order appointing the limited conservator, and includes the guardian of the estate of a married minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3006.

“Conservatorship estate” includes the guardianship estate of a married minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3008.

“Conservatorship proceeding” means conservatorship of the estate proceeding and includes a guardianship of the estate proceeding of a married minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

(a) Unless the spouse lacks legal capacity under the applicable standard prescribed in subdivision (b), a spouse has legal capacity to:

(1) Manage and control community property, including legal capacity to dispose of community property.

(2) Join in or consent to a transaction involving community property.

(b) A spouse lacks legal capacity to:

(1) Manage and control, including legal capacity to dispose of, community property if the spouse is substantially unable to manage or control the community property.

(2) Join in or consent to a transaction involving community property if the spouse does not have legal capacity for the particular transaction measured by principles of law otherwise applicable to the particular transaction.

(3) Do any act, or engage in any activity, described in paragraph (1) or (2) if the spouse has a conservator.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a spouse, whether or not lacking legal capacity, any of the following:

(1) The right to control an allowance provided under Section 2421.

(2) The right to control wages or salary to the extent provided in Section 2601.

(3) The right to make a will.

(4) The right to enter into transactions to the extent reasonable to provide the necessities of life to the spouse, the other spouse, and the minor children of the spouses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [3020. - 3023.]

3020.

(a) The proceeds, rents, issues, and profits of community property dealt with or disposed of under this division, and any property taken in exchange for the community property or acquired with the proceeds, are community property. 

(b) Except as provided in this part for the management, control, and disposition of community property, nothing in this division alters the rights of the spouses in community property or in the proceeds, rents, issues, or profits of community property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), where one or both of the spouses has a conservator, the court in which any of the conservatorship proceedings is pending may hear and determine whether property is community property or the separate property of either spouse when the issue is raised in any proceeding under this division.

(b) Any person having or claiming title to or an interest in the property, at or prior to the hearing on the issue, may object to the hearing if the court is not the proper court under any other provision of law for the trial of an action to determine the issue. If the objection is established, the court shall not hear and determine the issue.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if a civil action is pending with respect to the issue and jurisdiction has been obtained in the court in which the civil action is pending, upon request of any party to the civil action, the court shall abate the hearing until the conclusion of the civil action.

(d) The court need not abate the hearing if the court determines that the civil action was filed for the purpose of delay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Management, Control, and Disposition [3051. - 3092.]



  ARTICLE 1. Management, Control, and Disposition Generally [3051. - 3057.]

3051.

(a) Subject to Section 3071, the right of a spouse to manage and control community property, including the right to dispose of community property, is not affected by the lack or alleged lack of legal capacity of the other spouse. 

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if one spouse has legal capacity and the other has a conservator:

(1) The spouse who has legal capacity has the exclusive management and control of the community property including, subject to Section 3071, the exclusive power to dispose of the community property.

(2) The community property is not part of the conservatorship estate.

(c) If one spouse has legal capacity and the other has a conservator, the spouse having legal capacity may consent, by a writing filed in the proceeding, that all or part of the community property be included in and, subject to Section 3071, be managed, controlled, and disposed of as a part of the conservatorship estate.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), if both spouses have conservators, an undivided one-half interest in the community property shall be included in and, subject to Section 3071, be managed, controlled, and disposed of as a part of the conservatorship estate of each spouse.

(e) If both spouses have conservators, when authorized by order of the court in which any of the conservatorship proceedings is pending, the conservators may agree in writing that all or specific parts of the community property shall be included in the conservatorship estate of one or the other of the spouses and, subject to Section 3071, be managed, controlled, and disposed of as a part of the conservatorship estate of that spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3054.

When community property is included or proposed to be included in the conservatorship estate of a spouse, the court in which the conservatorship proceeding is pending, upon its own motion or upon petition of a spouse having legal capacity or the conservator of either spouse and upon such notice to such persons as the court prescribes, may do any of the following:

(a) Determine that the inclusion of some or all of the community property that is proposed to be included in the conservatorship estate would not be in the best interest of the spouses or their estates and order that such property not be included.

(b) Permit revocation of a written consent for inclusion of property in the conservatorship estate, with or without terms or conditions.

(c) Determine that the continued inclusion of some or all of the community property in the conservatorship estate is not in the best interest of the spouses or their estates and order that the inclusion of such property in the conservatorship estate be terminated, with or without terms or conditions.

(d) Make such other orders as may be appropriate for the orderly administration of the conservatorship estate or to protect the interests of the spouses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3055.

(a) If consent is given under this article that community property be included in the conservatorship estate of a spouse, the death of either spouse terminates the consent.

(b) If a spouse consents under this article that community property be included in the conservatorship estate of the other spouse:

(1) Subject to paragraph (2), the subsequent lack of legal capacity of the spouse giving the consent has no effect on the inclusion of the property in the conservatorship estate of the other spouse.

(2) The appointment of a conservator for the spouse giving the consent terminates the consent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3056.

Except as otherwise provided in this part and subject to Section 3071, when community property is included in a conservatorship estate under this article for the purpose of management, control, and disposition, the conservator has the same powers and duties with respect to such property as the conservator has with respect to other property of the conservatorship estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3057.

(a) Where a spouse lacks legal capacity and does not have a conservator, any interested person who has knowledge or reason to believe that the rights of such spouse in the community property are being prejudiced may bring an action on behalf of such spouse to enforce the duty imposed by Sections 721 and 1100 of the Family Code with respect to the management and control of the community property and to obtain such relief as may be appropriate.

(b) If one spouse has a conservator and the other spouse is managing or controlling community property, the conservator has the duty to keep reasonably informed concerning the management and control, including the disposition, of the community property. If the conservator has knowledge or reason to believe that the rights of the conservatee in the community property are being prejudiced, the conservator may bring an action on behalf of the conservatee to enforce the duty imposed by Sections 721 and 1100 of the Family Code with respect to the management and control of the community property and to obtain such relief as may be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Substitute for Joinder or Consent Requirements [3070. - 3074.]

3070.

If the requirements of this article are satisfied with respect to a transaction described in Section 3071, the transaction is deemed to satisfy the joinder or consent requirements of the statute referred to in that section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3071.

(a) In case of a transaction for which the joinder or consent of both spouses is required by Section 1100 or 1102 of the Family Code or by any other statute, if one or both spouses lacks legal capacity for the transaction, the requirement of joinder or consent shall be satisfied as provided in this section.

(b) Where one spouse has legal capacity for the transaction and the other spouse has a conservator, the requirement of joinder or consent is satisfied if both of the following are obtained:

(1) The joinder or consent of the spouse having legal capacity.

(2) The joinder or consent of the conservator of the other spouse given in compliance with Section 3072.

(c) Where both spouses have conservators, the joinder or consent requirement is satisfied by the joinder or consent of each such conservator given in compliance with Section 3072.

(d) In any case, the requirement of joinder or consent is satisfied if the transaction is authorized by an order of court obtained in a proceeding pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

3072.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a conservator may join in or consent to a transaction under Section 3071 only after authorization by either of the following:

(1) An order of the court obtained in the conservatorship proceeding upon a petition filed pursuant to Section 2403 or under Article 7 (commencing with Section 2540) or 10 (commencing with Section 2580) of Chapter 6 of Part 4.

(2) An order of the court made in a proceeding pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3100).

(b) A conservator may consent without court authorization to a sale, conveyance, or encumbrance of community personal property requiring consent under subdivision (c) of Section 1100 of the Family Code if the conservator could sell or transfer the property under Section 2545 without court authorization if the property were a part of the conservatorship estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 223.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3073.

(a) The joinder or consent under Section 3071 of a spouse having legal capacity shall be in a manner that complies with Section 1100 or 1102 of the Family Code or other statute that applies to the transaction.

(b) The joinder or consent under Section 3071 of a conservator shall be in the same manner as a spouse would join in or consent to the transaction under the statute that applies to the transaction except that the joinder or consent shall be executed by the conservator and shall refer to the court order, if one is required, authorizing the conservator to join in or consent to the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 224.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3074.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a transaction that affects real property, entered into by a person acting in good faith and for a valuable consideration, is not affected by the fact that one or both spouses have conservators unless a notice of the establishment of the conservatorship or conservatorships, as the case may be, has been recorded prior to the transaction in the county in which the property is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enforcement of Support of Spouse Who Has Conservator [3080. - 3092.]

3080.

If one spouse has a conservator and the other spouse has the management or control of community property, the conservator or conservatee, a relative or friend of the conservatee, or any interested person may file a petition under this article in the court in which the conservatorship proceeding is pending for an order requiring the spouse who has the management or control of community property to apply the income or principal, or both, of the community property to the support and maintenance of the conservatee as ordered by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3081.

(a) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(b) If the spouse who has the management or control of community property is not the conservator, the petitioner shall also cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served on that spouse in accordance with Title 5 (commencing with Section 410.10) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3082.

Upon the filing of a petition under this article, the court may cite the spouse who has the management or control of community property to appear before the court, and the court and the petitioner may examine the spouse under oath concerning the community property and other matters relevant to the petition filed under this article. If the person so cited refuses to appear and submit to an examination, the court may proceed against the person as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 8870) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 7. Upon such examination, the court may make an order requiring the person cited to disclose his or her knowledge of the community property and other matters relevant to the petition filed under this article, and if the order is not complied with the court may proceed against the person as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 8870) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 7.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3083.

In any proceeding under this article, the court may, after notice and hearing, order the spouse who has the management or control of community property to pay from the community property such amount as the court determines is necessary to the support and maintenance of the conservatee spouse pending the determination of the petition under this article. An order made pursuant to this section does not prejudice the rights of the spouses or other interested parties with respect to any subsequent order which may be made under this article. Any order made under this section may be modified or revoked at any time except as to any amount that may have accrued prior to the date of filing of the petition to modify or revoke the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3084.

When a petition is filed under this article, the spouse having the management or control of community property shall serve and file a current income and expense declaration and a current property declaration on the forms prescribed by the Judicial Council for use in family law proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.

During the pendency of any proceeding under this article, the court, upon the application of the petitioner, may issue ex parte orders:

(a) Restraining the spouse having the management or control of community property from transferring, encumbering, hypothecating, concealing, or in any way disposing of any property, real or personal, whether community, quasi-community, or separate, except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life.

(b) Requiring the spouse having the management or control of the community property to notify the petitioner of any proposed extraordinary expenditures and to account to the court for all such extraordinary expenditures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3086.

Any person interested in the proceeding under this article may request time for filing a response to the petition, for discovery proceedings, or for other preparation for the hearing, and the court shall grant a continuance for a reasonable time for any of such purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3087.

In a proceeding under this article, the court may hear and determine whether property is community property or the separate property of either spouse if that issue is raised in the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3088.

(a) The court may order the spouse who has the management or control of community property to apply the income or principal, or both, of the community property to the support and maintenance of the conservatee, including care, treatment, and support of a conservatee who is a patient in a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, as ordered by the court.

(b) In determining the amount ordered for support and maintenance, the court shall consider the following circumstances of the spouses:

(1) The earning capacity and needs of each
 spouse.

(2) The obligations and assets, including the separate property, of each spouse.

(3) The duration of the marriage.

(4) The age and health of the spouses.

(5) The standard of living of the spouses.

(6) Any other relevant factors which it considers just and equitable.

(c) At the request of any interested person, the court shall make appropriate findings with respect to the circumstances.

(d) The court may order the spouse who has the management or control of community
 property to make a specified monthly or other periodic payment to the conservator of the person of the conservatee or to any other person designated in the order. The
 court may order the spouse required to make the periodic payments to give reasonable security therefor.

(e) (1) The court may order the spouse required to make the periodic payments to assign, to the person designated in the order to receive the payments, that portion of the earnings of the spouse due or to be due in the future as will be sufficient to pay the amount ordered by the court for the support and maintenance of the conservatee. The order operates as an assignment and is binding upon any existing or future employer upon whom a copy of the order is served. The order shall be in the form of an earnings assignment order for support prescribed by the Judicial Council for use in family law proceedings. The employer may deduct the sum of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each payment made pursuant
 to the order. Any such assignment made pursuant to court order shall have priority as against any execution or other
 assignment unless otherwise ordered by the court or unless the other assignment is made pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) of Part 5 of Division 9 of the Family Code. An employer shall not use any assignment authorized by this subdivision as grounds for the dismissal of that employee.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “employer” includes the United States government and any public entity as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code. This subdivision applies to the money and benefits described in Sections 704.110 and 704.113 of the Code of Civil Procedure to the extent that those moneys and benefits are subject to a wage assignment for support under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) The court retains jurisdiction to modify or to vacate an order made under this section where justice requires, except as to any amount that may have accrued before the date of the filing of the petition to modify or revoke the order. At the request of any interested person, the order of modification or revocation shall include findings of fact and may be made retroactive to the date of the filing of the petition to revoke or modify, or to any date subsequent thereto. At least 15 days before the hearing on the petition to modify or vacate the order, the petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, accompanied by a copy of the petition, to the spouse who has the management or control of the community property. Notice shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part
 1 to any other persons entitled to notice of the hearing under that chapter.

(g) In a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage or for legal
 separation, the court has jurisdiction to modify or vacate an order made under this section to the same extent as it may modify or vacate an order made in the proceeding for dissolution of the marriage or for legal separation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 56.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3089.

If the spouse who has the management or control of the community property refuses to comply with any order made under this article or an order made in a separate action to provide support for the conservatee spouse, upon request of the petitioner or other interested person, the court may, in its discretion, divide the community property and the quasi-community property of the spouses, as it exists at the time of division, equally in the same manner as where a marriage is dissolved. If the property is so divided, the property awarded to each spouse is the separate property of that spouse and the court shall order that the property awarded to the conservatee spouse be transferred or paid over to the conservator of the estate of that spouse to be included in the conservatorship estate and be managed, controlled, and disposed of as a part of the conservatorship estate. The fact that property has been divided pursuant to this section has no effect on the nature of property thereafter acquired by the spouses, and the determination whether the thereafter-acquired property is community or separate property shall be made without regard to the fact that property has been divided pursuant to this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3090.

Any order of the court made under this article may be enforced by the court by execution, the appointment of a receiver, contempt, or by such other order or orders as the court in its discretion may from time to time deem necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3091.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Judicial Council may provide by rule for the practice and procedure in proceedings under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3092.

Nothing in this article affects or limits the right of the conservator or any interested person to institute an action against any person to enforce the duty otherwise imposed by law to support the spouse having a conservator. This article is permissive and in addition to any other procedure otherwise available to enforce the obligation of support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Proceeding for Particular Transaction [3100. - 3154.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3100. - 3102.]

3100.

(a) As used in this chapter, “transaction” means a transaction that involves community real or personal property, tangible or intangible, or an interest therein or a lien or encumbrance thereon, including, but not limited to, those transactions with respect thereto as are listed in Section 3102.

(b) However, if a proposed transaction involves property in which a spouse also has a separate property interest, for good cause the court may include that separate property in the transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 877, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3101.
